Utah statutes.
76-2-304.   Ignorance or mistake of fact or law.

(1) Unless otherwise provided, ignorance or mistake of fact which disproves the culpable mental state is a defense to any prosecution for that crime.

(2)  Ignorance or mistake concerning the existence or meaning of a penal law is no defense to a crime unless:

(a)  Due to his ignorance or mistake, the actor reasonably believed his conduct did not constitute an offense, and

(b)  His ignorance or mistake resulted from the actor's reasonable reliance upon:

(i)  An official statement of the law contained in a written order or grant of permission by an administrative agency charged by law with responsibility for interpreting the law in question; or

(ii)  A written interpretation of the law contained in an opinion of a court of record or made by a public servant charged by law with responsibility for interpreting the law in question.

(3)  Although an actor's ignorance or mistake of fact or law may constitute a defense to the offense charged, he may nevertheless be convicted of a lesser included offense of which he would be guilty if the fact or law were as he believed.



Amended by Chapter 32, 1974 General Session

